Washington statutes.
RCW 15.100.110

Assessment for permanent funding of commission—Adjustments—Referendum.

(1) To provide for permanent funding of the forest products commission, an assessment shall be levied by the commission on producers of each species of forest products. The initial rate of assessment that shall be submitted for approval by referendum pursuant to RCW 15.100.120 is fifty-seven cents per thousand board feet. The initial assessment is not effective until approved by a majority of producers as required by RCW 15.100.120.

(2) After the initial assessment rate is approved, the commission may adjust the amount of the assessment within a range of forty-five cents up to ninety cents per thousand board feet. The commission shall submit any proposed increase in the assessment to producers pursuant to the referendum process established in this section, and shall supply all known producers with a ballot for the referendum. The commission shall establish the assessment for the marketing year by January 1st of each year, or as soon thereafter as possible. Assessments may only be used for the purposes and objects of this chapter.

(3) The forest products commission may raise the assessment on forest products in excess of the fiscal growth factor under chapter 43.135 RCW. The assessment limits established by this section are solely to provide prior legislative authority for the purposes of RCW 43.135.055 and are not a limit on the authority of the forest products commission to alter assessments in any manner not limited by RCW 43.135.055. However, any alteration in assessments made under this section must be made with the procedural requirements established by this chapter for altering such assessments.

(4) The requirement for approval of an assessment is met if: (a) At least fifty-one percent by numbers of producers replying in the referendum vote affirmatively, and these producers represent at least sixty-one percent of the volume of the producers replying in the referendum; or (b) sixty-five percent by numbers of producers replying in the referendum vote affirmatively, and these producers represent at least fifty-one percent of the volume of the producers replying in the referendum. An assessment shall only be approved if at least forty percent of the eligible producers participate in the vote.

[ 2001 c 314 s 11.]